New York, session 2025-2026, A9609.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 217 of the workers' compen- 2 sation law, as amended by section 16 of part SS of chapter 54 of the 3 laws of 2016, are amended to read as follows: 4 1. Written notice and proof of disability or proof of need for family 5 leave shall be furnished to the employer by or on behalf of the employee 6 claiming benefits or, in the case of a claimant under section two 7 hundred seven of this article, to the chair, within thirty days after 8 commencement of the period of disability. Additional proof shall be 9 furnished thereafter from time to time as the employer or carrier or 10 chair may require but not more often than once each week. Such proof 11 shall include a statement of disability by the employee's attending 12 physician or attending nurse practitioner or attending podiatrist or 13 attending chiropractor or attending dentist or attending psychologist or 14 attending certified nurse midwife or family leave care recipient's 15 health care provider, or in the case of an employee who adheres to the 16 faith or teachings of any church or denomination, and who in accordance 17 with its creed, tenets or principles depends for healing upon prayer 18 through spiritual means alone in the practice of religion, by an accred- 19 ited practitioner, containing facts and opinions as to such disability 20 in compliance with regulations of the chair. Failure to furnish notice 21 or proof within the time and in the manner above provided shall not 22 invalidate the claim but no benefits shall be required to be paid for 23 any period more than two weeks prior to the date on which the required 24 proof is furnished unless it shall be shown to the satisfaction of the 25 chair not to have been reasonably possible to furnish such notice or 26 proof and that such notice or proof was furnished as soon as possible; 27 provided, however, that no benefits shall be paid unless the required EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11453-02-5 A. 9609 2 1 proof of disability is furnished within the period of actual disability 2 or family leave that does not exceed the statutory maximum period 3 permitted under section two hundred four of this article. No limitation 4 of time provided in this section shall run as against any disabled 5 employee who is mentally incompetent, or physically incapable of provid- 6 ing such notice as a result of a serious medical condition, or a minor 7 so long as such person has no guardian of the person and/or property. 8 2. An employee claiming disability benefits shall, as requested by the 9 employer or carrier, submit [himself or herself] themselves at inter- 10 vals, but not more than once a week, for examination by a physician or 11 nurse practitioner or podiatrist or chiropractor or dentist or psychol- 12 ogist or certified nurse midwife designated by the employer or carrier. 13 All such examinations shall be without cost to the employee and shall be 14 held at a reasonable time and place. 15 § 2. Subdivisions 16 and 17 of section 11-0901 of the environmental 16 conservation law, subdivision 16 as amended by section 13 of part EE of 17 chapter 55 of the laws of 2014, subdivision 17 as added by chapter 424 18 of the laws of 1992, and such subdivisions as renumbered by chapter 762 19 of the laws of 2023, are amended to read as follows: 20 16. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section, the 21 department may adopt regulations to allow the taking of big game or 22 small game by the use of a long bow equipped with a mechanical device 23 for holding and releasing the bowstring, attached to the handle section 24 of an otherwise legal long bow, to any person with a physical disability 25 who is physically incapable of drawing and holding a long bow because of 26 a physical disability, subject to such restrictions as the department 27 may adopt by regulation. For the purpose of this subdivision, a person 28 with a physical disability shall mean any person who submits to the 29 department a statement of a physician duly licensed to practice medicine 30 or of a duly certified nurse practitioner that such person is physically 31 incapable of arm movement sufficient to draw, hold and release a long 32 bow as defined in subdivision four of this section or as otherwise 33 defined in department regulation. The department is authorized to adopt 34 regulations requiring documentation to establish that an applicant is 35 eligible to use a mechanical device pursuant to this subdivision. 36 17. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section, the 37 department may issue to a physically disabled person a permit to take 38 big game or small game by the use of a cross-bow equipped with an appa- 39 ratus permitting release of the bowstring by means of such person's 40 discharge of breath. For the purposes of this subdivision, "physically 41 disabled person" shall mean any person who submits to the department a 42 statement of a physician duly licensed to practice medicine in this 43 state, or of a duly certified nurse practitioner, that such person is 44 permanently physically incapable of arm movement sufficient to release a 45 pre-drawn bow authorized under subdivision fifteen of this section. 46 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 47 have become a law.